Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,184.02
Act; regulation of landscape architecture; prohibited acts.

To protect public health, safety, and welfare, the Professional Landscape Architects Act regulates the title and practice of landscape architecture in the State of Nebraska. No person may engage in the practice of landscape architecture, use the designation of professional landscape architect, landscape architect, or any derivative thereof, or advertise any title or description tending to convey the impression that he or she is a professional landscape architect, unless the person is authorized in the manner provided in the act and complies with all provisions of the act. The practice of landscape architecture is a privilege granted by the board, based on the qualifications of the individual, and evidenced by a license.

Laws 2020, LB30, § 2.